Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5680YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2111 Section 1. Section 907.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (10) The offense is a violation of 3 section 728.12. 4 Sec. 2. Section 907.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. A sentence imposed pursuant to section 7 728.12. 8